Hawaii statutes.
§107-5 Costs, fees and charges. The
department of accounting and general services shall be reimbursed for the
reasonable costs incurred in furnishing supplies and performing services for
any other state department or agency in accordance with a schedule of fees and
charges approved by the director of finance after taking into consideration the
amount of funds available to such department or agency for such purpose,
provided that this section shall not apply to the department of land and
natural resources. [L 1951, c 283, §3; RL 1955, §103-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§§12, 14, 21; am L 1961, c 132, §1; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §107-5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next